Louisiana, session 2026, SB124.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The introductory paragraph of R.S.13:3715.3(A), 3715.3(A)(2), (B), and
(G)(1)(b) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 13:3715.3(G)(1)(c) and (d) and (H)
are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§3715.3. Peer review committee records; confidentiality
A. Notwithstanding the provisions of R.S. 44:7(D) or any other law to the
contrary, all records, notes, data, studies, analyses, exhibits, and proceedings, as
defined in this Section, of:
* * *
(2) Any hospital committee, health system committee, the peer review
committees of any medical organization, dental association, professional nursing
association, nursing home association, social workers association, group medical
practice of twenty or more physicians, nursing home, ambulatory surgical center
licensed pursuant to R.S. 40:2131 et seq., ambulance service company, health
maintenance organization, any nationally recognized improvement agency or
commission, including but not limited to the Joint Commission on Accreditation of
Healthcare Organizations (JCAHO), or any committee or agency thereof, or any
healthcare licensure agency of the Louisiana Department of Health, or healthcare
provider as defined in R.S. 40:1299.41(A), or extended care facility committee,
Page 1 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 124 ENROLLED
including but not limited to the credentials committee, the medical staff executive
committee, the risk management committee, or the quality assurance committee, and
any peer review committee of a health system, any committee determining a root
cause analysis of a sentinel event, established by the peer review committees of a
medical organization, dental organization, group medical practice of twenty or more
physicians, social workers association, ambulatory surgical center licensed pursuant
to R.S. 40:2131 et seq., ambulance service company, health maintenance
organization, or healthcare provider as defined in R.S. 40:1299.41(A), or private
hospital licensed under the provisions of R.S. 40:2100 et seq., shall be confidential
wherever located and shall be used by such committee and the members thereof only
in the exercise of the proper functions of the committee and shall not be available for
discovery or court subpoena regardless of where located, except in any proceedings
affecting the hospital staff privileges of a physician, dentist, psychologist, or
podiatrist the records forming the basis of any decision adverse to the physician,
dentist, psychologist, or podiatrist may be obtained by the physician, dentist,
psychologist, or podiatrist only. However, no original record or document, which is
otherwise discoverable, prepared by any person, other than a member of the peer
review committee or the staff of the peer review committee, may be held confidential
solely because it is the only copy and is in the possession of a peer review
committee.
B. No employee, physician, dentist, public or private hospital, organization,
health system, or institution furnishing information, data, reports, or records to any
such committee with respect to any patient examined or treated by such physician
or dentist or confined in such hospital or institution shall be liable in damages to any
person by reason of furnishing such information.
* * *
G.(1) As used in this Subsection, the following terms shall mean:
* * *
(b) "Health system" shall mean any of the following:
(i) A group of two or more hospitals that are owned, operated,
Page 2 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 124 ENROLLED
sponsored, or managed by a single entity, or that are subject to the control and
direction of a common owner or parent company.
(ii) Any parent entity, holding company, or affiliated group of entities
under common ownership or control that owns, operates, manages, or is
affiliated with one or more hospitals, clinics, physician practices, or other
healthcare providers.
(b)(c) "Licensee" means an individual who possesses a license, certificate,
or registration duly issued by a board, or an individual who has made application for
such a license, certificate, or registration.
(d) "Records and proceedings" shall mean and include, without
limitation, all records, notes, data, reports, memoranda, analyses studies,
exhibits, minutes, draft documents, emails, electronic communications, and
work product generated by, for, or at the direction of a committee covered by
this Section.
* * *
H.(1) A health system or hospital within a health system that conducts
as part of its regular business activities any form of professional credentialing
or quality review activities involving the competence of, professional conduct
of, or quality of care provided by healthcare providers identified in Subsection
A of this Section, may share such peer review records as described in Subsection
A of this Section within a health system or among hospitals within the same
health system so long as such peer review records are used only for
credentialing, quality review, competency purposes, professional conduct
purposes, or patient safety activities as defined by the Patient Safety and
Quality Improvement Act of 2005, 42 U.S.C. 299b-21 through 299b-26.
(2) When disclosure is requested and made in a manner authorized in
Paragraph (1) of this Subsection, the verbal, written, or other disclosure of peer
review records and proceedings by any person, committee, hospital, health
system, or other peer review entity described in Subsection A of this Section
within the same health system or among or between hospitals within the same
Page 3 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 124 ENROLLED
health system shall not constitute a waiver of any legal or evidentiary privilege,
nor form the basis of any claim or suit for damages or injunctive relief of
whatsoever kind or nature, including breach of confidentiality or invasion of
privacy or otherwise, and the person, hospital, health system, or other peer
review entity making the disclosure shall be entitled to the benefit of the
immunities otherwise provided for in Subsections B and C of this Section.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.